California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Every dealer shall conspicuously display a notice, not less than 8 inches high and 10 inches wide, in each sales office and sales cubicle of a dealer’s established place of business where written terms of specific sale or lease transactions are discussed with prospective purchasers or lessees, and in each room of a dealer’s established place of business where sale and lease contracts are regularly executed, which states the following:

“THERE IS NO COOLING-OFF PERIOD UNLESS YOU OBTAIN A CONTRACT CANCELLATION OPTION

California law does not provide for a “cooling-off” or other cancellation period for vehicle lease or purchase contracts. Therefore,
 you cannot later cancel such a contract simply because you change your mind, decide the vehicle costs too much, or wish you had acquired a different vehicle. After you sign a motor vehicle purchase or lease contract, it may only be canceled with the agreement of the seller or lessor or for legal cause, such as fraud.

However, California law does require a seller to offer a 2-day contract cancellation option on used vehicles with a purchase price of less than $40,000, subject to certain statutory conditions. This contract cancellation option requirement does not apply to the sale of a recreational vehicle, a motorcycle, or an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under California law. See the vehicle contract cancellation option agreement for details.”

(b) This section
 shall remain in effect only until October 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 8.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

11709.2.

(a) Every dealer shall conspicuously display a physical notice, in at least 36-point type, in each sales office and sales cubicle of a dealer’s established place of business where written terms of specific sale or lease transactions are discussed with prospective purchasers or lessees, and in each room of a dealer’s established place of business where sale and lease contracts are regularly executed that states the following:“CALIFORNIA DOES NOT HAVE A COOLING-OFF PERIOD FOR NEW VEHICLES. BUT IF YOU PURCHASED OR LEASED A USED VEHICLE FOR $50,000 OR LESS, YOU HAVE 3 DAYS TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON. ADDITIONAL RESTRICTIONS MAY APPLY, INCLUDING A RESTOCKING
 FEE. ASK THE DEALER FOR MORE INFORMATION ABOUT HOW TO EXERCISE THIS RIGHT.”(b) If the dealer also sells or leases motorcycles or off-highway motor vehicles at the same location as vehicles subject to the right to cancel, the physical notice shall contain the following additional language, in at least 36-point type:

“This cooling-off period also does not apply to the sale of a motorcycle or an off-highway motor vehicle subject to registration under California law. See the vehicle contract for details.” 

(c) This section shall become operative October 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 9.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11709.3.

(a) Every dealer shall clearly and conspicuously display in its showroom at its established place of business, in a place that is easily accessible to prospective purchasers, a clear and conspicuous listing of each vehicle that the dealer has advertised for sale if the vehicle meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The vehicle is advertised for sale in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation, or in any other advertising medium that is disseminated to the
 public generally, including, but not limited to, radio, television, or the Internet.

(2) The vehicle is advertised at a specific price and is required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11713.1 to be identified in the advertisement by its vehicle identification number or license number.

(3) The vehicle has not been sold or leased during the time that the advertised price is valid.

(4) The vehicle does not clearly and conspicuously have displayed on or in it the advertised price.

(b) The listing required by subdivision (a) may be satisfied by clearly and conspicuously posting in the showroom a complete copy of any print advertisement that includes vehicles currently advertised for sale or by clearly and conspicuously displaying in the showroom a list
 of currently advertised vehicles described by make, model, model-year, vehicle identification number, or license number, and the advertised price.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11709.4.

(a) When a dealer purchases or obtains a vehicle in trade in a retail sale or lease transaction and the vehicle is subject to a prior credit or lease balance, all of the following apply:

(1) If the dealer agreed to pay a specified amount on the prior credit or lease balance owing on the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade, and the
 agreement to pay the specified amount is contained in a written agreement documenting the transaction, the dealer shall tender the agreed upon amount as provided in the written agreement to the lessor registered in accordance with Section 4453.5, or to the legal owner reflected on the ownership certificate, or to the designee of that lessor or legal owner of the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade within 21 calendar days of purchasing or obtaining the vehicle in trade.

(2) If the dealer did not set forth an agreement regarding payment of a prior credit or lease balance owed on the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade, in a written agreement documenting the transaction, the dealer shall tender to the lessor registered in accordance with Section 4453.5, or to the legal owner reflected on the ownership certificate, or to the designee of that lessor or legal owner of the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade, an amount necessary to discharge
 the prior credit or lease balance owing on the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade within 21 calendar days of purchasing or obtaining the vehicle in trade.

(3) The time period specified in paragraph (1) or (2) may be shortened if the dealer and consumer agree, in writing, to a shorter time period.

(4) A dealer shall not sell, consign for sale, or transfer any ownership interest in the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade until an amount necessary to discharge the prior credit or lease balance owing on the vehicle has been tendered to the lessor registered in accordance with Section 4453.5, or to the legal owner reflected on the ownership certificate, or to the designee of that lessor or legal owner of the vehicle purchased or obtained in trade.

(b) A dealer does not violate this section if the dealer reasonably
 and in good faith gives notice of rescission of the contract promptly, but no later than 21 days after the date on which the vehicle was purchased or obtained in trade, and the contract is thereafter rescinded on any of the grounds in Section 1689 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 228.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11710.

(a) Before any dealer’s or remanufacturer’s license is issued or renewed by the department to any applicant therefor, the applicant shall procure and file with the department a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, approved as to form by the Attorney General, and conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud or make any fraudulent representation which will cause a monetary loss to a purchaser, seller, financing agency, or governmental agency.

(b) A
 dealer’s bond shall be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), except the bond of a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles or all-terrain vehicles shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Before the license is renewed by the department, the dealer, other than a dealer who deals exclusively in motorcycles or all-terrain vehicles, shall procure and file a bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). A remanufacturer bond shall be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(c) Liability under the bond is to remain at full value. If the amount of liability under the bond is decreased or there is outstanding a final court judgment for which the dealer or remanufacturer and sureties are liable, the dealer’s or remanufacturer’s license shall be automatically suspended. In order to reinstate the license and special plates, the licensee shall either file an additional bond or restore the bond on file
 to the original amount, or shall terminate the outstanding judgment for which the dealer or remanufacturer and sureties are liable.

(d) A dealer’s or remanufacturer’s license, or renewal of the license, shall not be issued to any applicant therefor, unless and until the applicant files with the department a good and sufficient instrument, in writing, in which the applicant appoints the director as the true and lawful agent of the applicant upon whom all process may be served in any action, or actions, which may thereafter be commenced against the applicant, arising out of any claim for damages suffered by any firm, person, association, or corporation, by reason of the violation of the applicant of any of the terms and provisions of this code or any condition of the dealer’s or remanufacturer’s bond. The applicant shall stipulate and agree in the appointment that any process directed to the applicant, when personal service of process upon the
 applicant cannot be made in this state after due diligence and, in that case, is served upon the director or, in the event of the director’s absence from the office, upon any employee in charge of the office of the director, shall be of the same legal force and effect as if served upon the applicant personally. The applicant shall further stipulate and agree, in writing, that the agency created by the appointment shall continue for and during the period covered by any license that may be issued and so long thereafter as the applicant may be made to answer in damages for a violation of this code or any condition of the bond. The instrument appointing the director as the agent for the applicant for service of process shall be acknowledged by the applicant before a notary public. In any case where the licensee is served with process by service upon the director, one copy of the summons and complaint shall be left with the director or in the director’s office in Sacramento or mailed to the office of the director
 in Sacramento. A fee of five dollars ($5) shall also be paid to the director at the time of service of the copy of the summons and complaint. Service on the director shall be a sufficient service on the licensee if a notice of service and a copy of the summons and complaint are immediately sent by registered mail by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney to the licensee. A copy of the summons and complaint shall also be mailed by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney to the surety on the applicant’s bond at the address of the surety given in the bond, postpaid and registered with request for return receipt. The director shall keep a record of all process so served upon the director, which record shall show the day and hour of service and shall retain the summons and complaint so served on file. Where the licensee is served with process by service upon the director, the licensee shall have and be allowed 30 days from and after the service within which to answer any complaint or other pleading which may
 be filed in the cause. However, for purposes of venue, where the licensee is served with process by service upon the director, the service is deemed to have been made upon the licensee in the county in which the licensee has or last had an established place of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11710.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11710, the bond amount of a dealer who sells vehicles on a wholesale basis only, and who sells fewer than 25 vehicles per year, shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1110, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11710.2.

If a deposit is given instead of the bond required by Section 11710 both of the following apply:

(a) (1) The director may order the deposit returned at the expiration of any of the following dates:

(A) Three years from the date an applicant for a dealer’s license who has
 operated a business of selling vehicles under a temporary permit has ceased to do business.

(B) Three years from the date a licensee has ceased to be licensed, if the director is satisfied that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(C) Five years from the date a licensee secured and maintained a dealer bond, pursuant to Section 11710, after posting a deposit, if the director is satisfied that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(2) A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of the dates provided in paragraph (1) upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(b) If either the director, department, or state is a defendant in any
 action instituted to recover all or any part of the deposit, or any action is instituted by the director, department, or state to determine those entitled to any part of the deposit, the director, department, or state shall be paid reasonable attorney fees and costs from the deposit. Costs shall include those administrative costs incurred in processing claims against the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 483, Sec. 2.   (SB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11711.

(a) If any person (1) shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of any fraud practiced on him or fraudulent representation made to him by a licensed dealer or one of such dealer’s salesmen acting for the dealer, in his behalf, or within the scope of the employment of such salesman and such person has possession of a written instrument furnished by the licensee, containing stipulated provisions and guarantees which the person believes have been violated by the licensee, or (2) if any person shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of the violation by such dealer or salesman of any of the provisions of
 Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code, or (3) if any person is not paid for a vehicle sold to and purchased by a licensee, then any such person shall have a right of action against such dealer, his salesman, and the surety upon the dealer’s bond, in an amount not to exceed the value of the vehicle purchased from or sold to the dealer.

(b) If the state or any political subdivision thereof shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of any fraud practiced on the state or fraudulent representation made to the state by a licensed dealer, or one of such dealer’s representatives acting for the dealer, in his behalf, or within the scope of employment of such representatives, or shall suffer any loss or damage by reason of the violation of such dealer or representative of any of the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code, or Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), Division 2 of the
 Revenue and Taxation Code, the state or any political subdivision thereof, through the department, shall have a right of action against such dealer, his representative, and the surety upon the dealer’s bond in an amount not to exceed the value of the vehicles involved.

(c) The failure of a dealer upon demand to pay the fees and penalties determined to be due as provided in Section 4456 hereof is declared to be a violation of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of this code, and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and to constitute loss or damage to the state in the amounts of such fees and penalties determined to be due and not paid.

(d) The claims of the state under subdivision (b) shall be satisfied first and entitled to preference over all claims under subdivision (a).

(e) The claims of any person under subdivision (a) who is not a licensee shall be satisfied first and entitled to preference over all other claims under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

11711.3.

A person acting as a dealer, who was not licensed as a dealer as required by this article, or a person acting as a lessor-retailer, who was not licensed as a lessor-retailer as required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11600), may not enforce any security interest or bring or maintain any action in law or equity to recover any money or property or obtain other relief from the purchaser or lessee of a vehicle in connection with a transaction in which the person was, at the time of the transaction, required to be licensed as a dealer or a
 lessor-retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 304.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11712.

(a) The department shall not issue a dealer’s license to any applicant therefor who has not an established place of business as defined in this code. Should the dealer change the site or location of his established place of business, he or she shall, immediately upon making that change, so notify the department. Should a dealer for any reason whatsoever, cease to be in possession of an established place of business from and on which he or she conducts the business for which he or she is licensed, he or she shall immediately notify the department and, upon demand by the department, shall deliver to the department the dealer’s license,
 dealer’s special plate or plates, and all report of sale books in his or her possession.

(b) Should the dealer change to, or add another franchise for the sale of new vehicles, or cancel or, for any cause whatever, otherwise lose a franchise for the sale of new vehicles, he or she shall immediately so notify the department. 

(c) Any person licensed under this article who has closed his or her established place of business may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail at that place of business or at the mailing address of record if different from the established place of business, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

11712.5.

It is unlawful and a violation of this code for a dealer issued a license pursuant to this article to sell, offer for sale, or display any new vehicle, as follows:

(a) A new motorcycle unless there is securely attached thereto a statement as required by Section 24014.

(b) A new light duty truck with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or less unless there is affixed to the light duty truck the label required by Section 24013.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.

A holder of a license issued under this article shall not do any of the following:

(a) Make or disseminate, or cause to be made or disseminated, before the public in this state, in a newspaper or other publication, or an advertising device, or by public outcry or proclamation, or in any other manner or means whatever, a statement that is untrue or misleading and that is known, or that by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading; or to so make or disseminate, or cause to be so disseminated, a statement as part of a plan or scheme with the intent not to sell a vehicle or service so advertised at the price stated therein, or as so advertised.

(b) (1) (A) Advertise or offer for sale or exchange in any manner, a vehicle not actually for sale at the premises of the dealer or available to the dealer directly from the manufacturer or distributor of the vehicle at the time of the advertisement or offer. However, a dealer who has been issued an autobroker’s endorsement to the dealer’s license may advertise the dealer’s service of arranging or negotiating the purchase of a new motor vehicle from a franchised new motor vehicle dealer and may specify the line-makes and models of those new vehicles. Autobrokering service advertisements may not advertise the price or payment terms of a vehicle and shall disclose that the advertiser is an autobroker or auto buying service, and shall clearly and conspicuously state the following: “All new cars arranged
 for sale are subject to price and availability from the selling franchised new car dealer.”

(B) As to printed advertisements, the disclosure statement required by subparagraph (A) shall be printed in not less than 10-point bold type size and shall be textually segregated from the other portions of the printed advertisement.

(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), classified advertisements for autobrokering services that measure two column inches or less are exempt from the disclosure statement in subparagraph (A) pertaining to price and availability.

(3) Radio advertisements of a duration of less than 11 seconds that do not reference specific line-makes or models of motor vehicles are exempt from the disclosure
 statement required in subparagraph (A).

(c) Fail, within 48 hours, to withdraw in writing an advertisement of a vehicle that has been sold or withdrawn from sale.

(d) Advertise or represent a vehicle as a new vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle.

(e) Engage in the business for which the licensee is licensed without having in force and effect a bond as required by this article.

(f) Engage in the business for which the dealer is licensed without at all times maintaining an established place of business as required by this code.

(g) Include, as an added cost to the selling price of a vehicle,
 an amount for licensing or transfer of title of the vehicle, which is not due to the state unless, prior to the sale, that amount has been paid by a dealer to the state in order to avoid penalties that would have accrued because of late payment of the fees. However, a dealer may collect from the second purchaser of a vehicle a prorated fee based upon the number of months remaining in the registration year for that vehicle, if the vehicle had been previously sold by the dealer and the sale was subsequently rescinded and all the fees that were paid, as required by this code and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10751) of Part 5 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, were returned to the first purchaser of the vehicle.

(h) Employ a person as a salesperson who has not been licensed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing
 with Section 11800), and whose license is not displayed on the premises of the dealer as required by Section 11812, or willfully fail to notify the department by mail within 10 days of the employment or termination of employment of a salesperson.

(i) Deliver, following the sale, a vehicle for operation on California highways, if the vehicle does not meet all of the equipment requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000). This subdivision does not apply to the sale of a leased vehicle to the lessee if the lessee is in possession of the vehicle immediately prior to the time of the sale and the vehicle is registered in this state.

(j) Use, or permit the use of, the special plates assigned to them for any purpose other than as permitted by Section 11715.

(k) Advertise or otherwise represent, or knowingly allow to be advertised or represented on behalf of, or at the place of business of, the licenseholder that no downpayment is required in connection with the sale of a vehicle when a downpayment is in fact required and the buyer is advised or induced to finance the downpayment by a loan in addition to any other loan financing the remainder of the purchase price of the vehicle. The terms “no downpayment,” “zero down delivers,” or similar terms shall not be advertised unless the vehicle will be sold to a qualified purchaser without a prior payment of any kind or trade-in.

(l) (1) Participate in the sale of a vehicle required to be reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 5900 or 5901 without
 making the return and payment of the full tax due and required by Section 6451 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Participate in the sale of a used vehicle required to be reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 5900 or 5901 without making the payment of the full tax due as required by Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The amendments to this subdivision made by the act adding this paragraph do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(m) Permit the use of the dealer’s license, supplies, or books by any other person for the purpose of permitting that person to engage in the purchase or sale of vehicles required to be registered under this code, or permit the use
 of the dealer’s license, supplies, or books to operate a branch location to be used by any other person, whether or not the licensee has any financial or equitable interest or investment in the vehicles purchased or sold by, or the business of, or branch location used by, the other person.

(n) Violate any provision of Article 10 (commencing with Section 28050) of Chapter 5 of Division 12.

(o) Sell a previously unregistered vehicle without disclosing in writing to the purchaser the date on which a manufacturer’s or distributor’s warranty commenced.

(p) Accept a purchase deposit relative to the sale of a vehicle, unless the vehicle is present at the premises of the dealer or available to the dealer directly from the
 manufacturer or distributor of the vehicle at the time the dealer accepts the deposit. Purchase deposits accepted by an autobroker when brokering a retail sale shall be governed by Sections 11736 and 11737.

(q) Consign for sale to another dealer a new vehicle.

(r) Display a vehicle for sale at a location other than an established place of business authorized by the department for that dealer or display a new motor vehicle at the business premises of another dealer registered as an autobroker. This subdivision does not apply to the display of a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11709 or the demonstration of the qualities of a motor vehicle by way of a test drive.

(s) Use a picture in connection with an
 advertisement of the
 price of a specific vehicle or class of vehicles, unless the picture is of the year, make, and model being offered for sale. The picture shall not depict a vehicle with optional equipment or a design not actually offered at the advertised price.

(t) Advertise for sale a vehicle that was used by the selling licensee in its business as a demonstrator, executive vehicle, service vehicle, rental, loaner, or lease vehicle, unless the advertisement clearly and conspicuously discloses the previous use made by that licensee of the vehicle. An advertisement shall not describe any of those vehicles as “new.”

(u) Advertise the prior use or ownership history of a vehicle in an inaccurate manner.

(v) (1) Offer to a consumer a subscription service for any motor vehicle feature that utilizes components and hardware already installed on the motor vehicle at the time of purchase or lease and would function after activation without ongoing cost to or support by the dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or a third-party service provider.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to navigation system updates, satellite radio, roadside assistance, software-dependent driver assistance or driver automation features, and vehicle-connected services that rely on cellular or other data networks for continued operation.

(3) As used in this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Motor vehicle
 feature” means any convenience or safety function included on the motor vehicle, such as heated seats or driver assistance, that typically is offered to a consumer as an upgrade at the time of purchase or lease of the motor vehicle.

(B) “Subscription service” means a service provided in exchange for a recurring payment, including, but not limited to, a weekly, monthly, or annual payment charged to and made by a consumer, but does not include a consumer’s reoccurring payment made pursuant to a conditional sales contract or lease contract, as defined in Chapters 2b (commencing with Section 2981) and 2d (commencing with Section 2985.7) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.1.

It is a violation of this code for the holder of a dealer’s license issued under this article to do any of the following:

(a) Advertise a specific vehicle for sale without identifying the vehicle by its model, model-year, and either its license number or that portion of the vehicle identification number that distinguishes the vehicle from all other vehicles of the same make, model, and model-year. Model-year is not required to be advertised for current model-year vehicles. Year models are no longer current when ensuing year models are available for purchase at retail in California. An advertisement that offers for sale a class of new vehicles in a dealer’s inventory, consisting of five or more vehicles, that are all of the same make, model, and model-year is not required to include in
 the advertisement the vehicle identification numbers or license numbers of those vehicles.

(b) Advertise the total price of a vehicle without including all costs to the purchaser at time of sale, except taxes, vehicle registration fees, the California tire fee, as defined in Section 42885 of the Public Resources Code, emission testing charges not exceeding fifty dollars ($50), actual fees charged for certificates pursuant to Section 44060 of the Health and Safety Code, finance charges, and any dealer document processing charge or charge to electronically register or transfer the vehicle.

(c) (1) Exclude from an advertisement of a vehicle for sale that there will be added to the advertised total price at the time of sale, charges for sales tax, vehicle registration fees, the California tire fee, the fee charged by the state for the issuance of a certificate of
 compliance or noncompliance pursuant to a statute, finance charges, a charge to electronically register or transfer the vehicle, and a dealer document processing charge.

(2) The obligations imposed by paragraph (1) are satisfied by adding to the advertisement a statement containing no abbreviations and that is worded in substantially the following form: “Plus government fees and taxes, any finance charges, any dealer document processing charge, any electronic filing charge, and any emission testing charge.”

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), “advertisement” means an advertisement in a newspaper, magazine, or direct mail publication that is two or more columns in width or one column in width and more than seven inches in length, or on a Web page of a dealer’s Internet Web site that displays the price of a vehicle offered for sale on the Internet, as that term is defined in
 paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Represent the dealer document processing charge, electronic registration or transfer charge, or emission testing charge, as a governmental fee.

(e) Fail to sell a vehicle to a person at the advertised total price, exclusive of taxes, vehicle registration fees, the California tire fee, the fee charged by the state for the issuance of a certificate of compliance or noncompliance pursuant to a statute, finance charges, mobilehome escrow fees, the amount of a city, county, or city and county imposed fee or tax for a mobilehome, a dealer document processing charge, an electronic registration or transfer charge, and a charge for emission testing not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) plus the actual fees charged for certificates pursuant to Section 44060 of the Health and Safety Code, while the
 vehicle remains unsold, unless the advertisement states the advertised total price is good only for a specified time and the time has elapsed. Advertised vehicles shall be sold at or below the advertised total price, with statutorily permitted exclusions, regardless of whether the purchaser has knowledge of the advertised total price.

(f) (1) Advertise for sale, sell, or purchase for resale a new vehicle of a line-make for which the dealer does not hold a franchise.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a transaction involving the following:

(A) A mobilehome.

(B) A commercial coach, as defined in Section 18001.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) An off-highway motor
 vehicle subject to identification as defined in Section 38012.

(D) A manufactured home.

(E) A new vehicle that will be substantially altered or modified by a converter prior to resale.

(F) A commercial vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 10,000 pounds.

(G) A vehicle purchased for export and exported outside the territorial limits of the United States without being registered with the department.

(H) A vehicle acquired in the ordinary course of business as a new vehicle by a dealer franchised to sell that vehicle, if all of the following apply:

(i) The manufacturer or distributor of the vehicle files a
 bankruptcy petition.

(ii) The franchise agreement of the dealer is terminated, canceled, or rejected by the manufacturer or distributor as part of the bankruptcy proceedings and the termination, cancellation, or rejection is not a result of the revocation by the department of the dealer’s license or the dealer’s conviction of a crime.

(iii) The vehicle is held in the inventory of the dealer on the date the bankruptcy petition is filed.

(iv) The vehicle is sold by the dealer within six months of the date the bankruptcy petition is filed.

(3) Subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) does not entitle a dealer whose franchise agreement has been terminated, canceled, or rejected to continue to perform warranty service repairs or continue to be eligible to offer or
 receive consumer or dealer incentives offered by the manufacturer or distributor.

(g) Sell a park trailer, as specified in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, without disclosing in writing to the purchaser that a park trailer is required to be moved by a transporter or a licensed manufacturer or dealer under a permit issued by the Department of Transportation or a local authority with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions.

(h) Advertise free merchandise, gifts, or services provided by a dealer contingent on the purchase of a vehicle. “Free” includes merchandise or services offered for sale at a price less than the seller’s cost of the merchandise or services.

(i) (1) Advertise vehicles, and related goods or services, at a specified dealer price, with the intent not
 to supply reasonably expectable demand, unless the advertisement discloses the number of vehicles in stock at the advertised price. In addition, whether or not there are sufficient vehicles in stock to supply a reasonably expectable demand, when phrases such as “starting at,” “from,” “beginning as low as,” or words of similar import are used in reference to an advertised price, the advertisement shall disclose the number of vehicles available at that advertised price.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, in a newspaper advertisement for a vehicle that is two model-years old or newer, the actual phrase that states the number of vehicles in stock at the advertised price shall be printed in a type size that is at least equal to one-quarter of the type size, and in the same style and color of type, used for the advertised price. However, in no case shall the phrase be printed in less than 8-point type size, and the phrase shall be disclosed
 immediately above, below, or beside the advertised price without intervening words, pictures, marks, or symbols.

(3) The disclosure required by this subdivision is in addition to any other disclosure required by this code or any regulation regarding identifying vehicles advertised for sale.

(j) Use “rebate” or similar words, including, but not limited to, “cash back,” in advertising the sale of a vehicle unless the rebate is expressed in a specific dollar amount and is in fact a rebate offered by the vehicle manufacturer or distributor, a finance company affiliated with a vehicle manufacturer or distributor, a regulated utility, or a governmental entity directly to the retail purchaser of the vehicle or to the assignee of the retail purchaser.

(k) Require a person to pay a higher price for a vehicle and related goods
 or services for receiving advertised credit terms than the cash price the same person would have to pay to purchase the same vehicle and related goods or services. For the purpose of this subdivision, “cash price” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code.

(l) Advertise a guaranteed trade-in allowance.

(m) Misrepresent the authority of a salesperson, representative, or agent to negotiate the final terms of a transaction.

(n) (1) Use “invoice,” “dealer’s invoice,” “wholesale price,” or similar terms that refer to a dealer’s cost for a vehicle in an advertisement for the sale of a vehicle or advertise that the selling price of a vehicle is above, below, or at either of the following:

(A) The
 manufacturer’s or distributor’s invoice price to a dealer.

(B) A dealer’s cost.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to either of the following:

(A) A communication occurring during face-to-face negotiations for the purchase of a specific vehicle if the prospective purchaser initiates a discussion of the vehicle’s invoice price or the dealer’s cost for that vehicle.

(B) A communication between a dealer and a prospective commercial purchaser that is not disseminated to the general public. For purposes of this subparagraph, a “commercial purchaser” means a dealer, lessor, lessor-retailer, manufacturer, remanufacturer, distributor, financial institution, governmental entity, or person who purchases 10 or more vehicles during a year.

(o) Violate a law prohibiting bait and switch advertising, including, but not limited to, the guides against bait advertising set forth in Part 238 (commencing with Section 238) of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations read on January 1, 1988.

(p) Make an untrue or misleading statement indicating that a vehicle is equipped with all the factory-installed optional equipment the manufacturer offers, including, but not limited to, a false statement that a vehicle is “fully factory equipped.”

(q) Except as provided in Section 24014, affix on a new vehicle a supplemental price sticker containing a price
 that represents the dealer’s asking price that exceeds the manufacturer’s suggested retail price unless all of the following occur:
